Washington statutes.
RCW 2.48.110

Admission of veterans—Fees of veterans.

An applicant applying for admission to practice law under the provisions of RCW 2.48.070 through 2.48.090, shall pay the same fees as are required of residents of the state of Washington seeking admission to practice law by examination.

[ 1945 c 181 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 138-7E.]